North Dakota, session 69, SB2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES -
PROVIDER ACCREDITATION. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in
the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $240,000, or so much of the sum as
may be necessary, to the department of health and human services for the purpose of providing
grants to reimburse community providers serving individuals with disabilities for costs of
obtaining and maintaining accreditation standards required by the department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 1 25.0215.02000